Utah statutes.
57-9-5.   Notice of claim of interest -- Contents -- Filing for record.
In order to be effective and to be recorded, the notice required by Section
57-9-4 shall contain a legal description of all land affected by the notice.
If the claim is founded upon a recorded instrument, then the description in
the notice may be the same as that contained in the recorded instrument. The
notice shall be recorded in the county or counties where the land described is
situated.
